Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 37 Beef Council

Cross references. —

As to the department and director of agriculture, see ch. 2 of this title.

As to the Wyoming livestock board, see ch. 18 of this title.

As to agricultural marketing, see ch. 35 of this title.

As to cooperative marketing associations, see §§

17-10-101

to

17-10-253

.

§ 11-37-101.
Legislative intent.

The legislature intends
by this act to provide the cattle industry with authority to establish
a self-financed program to help market, develop, maintain and expand
in the state, national and foreign markets for beef and beef products
produced, processed or manufactured in this state, and the use and
consumption of such beef and beef products.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 224, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-688; W.S. 1977, §

11-42-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-37-102(a)(vii).

§ 11-37-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Beef” includes veal;

“Beef products” include veal products;

“Board” means the Wyoming livestock board;

“Council” means the Wyoming beef council;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 3.

“Producer” means any person who owns or acquires ownership of cattle, provided a person shall not be deemed a producer if:

The person’s only share in the proceeds of a sale of cattle or beef is a sales commission, handling fee or other service fee; or

The person:

Acquired ownership of cattle to facilitate the transfer of ownership of the cattle from the seller to a third party;

Resold the cattle no later than ten (10) days from the date on which the person acquired ownership; and

Certified, as required by the council, that the requirements of this subdivision have been satisfied.

“This act” means W.S.

11-37-101

through

11-37-110

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 224, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-689; W.S. 1977, §

11-42-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1989, ch. 112, § 1; 2009, ch. 90, § 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed former (a)(v) which read: “(a)(v) ‘Fiscal year’ means the fiscal year beginning July 1 and ending June 30”.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law. The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts. Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

§ 11-37-103.
Establishment; composition; appointment; term; removal; vacancies;
reimbursement for expenses.

There is created the Wyoming beef council. For administrative purposes the council shall be within the department of agriculture. The council shall be composed of five (5) producers appointed by the governor. The director of the department of agriculture or his designated representative shall serve ex officio without vote. With advice of the council, the governor may designate one (1) or more additional representatives of the beef industry to serve ex officio without vote. The appointed council members shall consist of three (3) producers of range cattle, one (1) cattle feeder and one (1) dairyman. The governor may remove any member he appoints as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

Upon the expiration of the term of an appointed member, a successor shall be appointed by the governor for a term of three (3) years. If a vacancy occurs, the governor shall appoint a person for the unexpired term.

The governor shall declare the office of any appointed member of the council vacant when he finds that:

The member is no longer a producer;

The member is unable to perform his duties; or

The member has become a resident of another state.

Members of the council shall serve without compensation but shall receive mileage and per diem as provided by law for state employees.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 224, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-690; W.S. 1977, § 11-42-103; Laws 1977, ch. 62, § 1; 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1989, ch. 112, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 11-37-104.
Powers and duties; employment of manager; duties of manager.

The council shall:

Receive and disburse funds under the provisions of this act to be used in administering the provisions of this act;

Annually elect a chairman from among its members. No chairman shall succeed himself more than once;

Appoint a secretary-treasurer who may be from among its members;

Meet regularly every four (4) months and at such other times as called by the chairman or when requested by three (3) or more members of the council;

Keep a permanent record of its proceedings and report to the governor respecting its activities as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

;

Establish and maintain promotion, information, education and research programs to market, develop, maintain and expand state, national and foreign markets for beef and beef products produced, processed or manufactured in Wyoming.

The council may:

Conduct or contract for scientific research to discover and develop improved marketing methods for beef and beef products, including programs of consumer education and protection;

Disseminate reliable information, founded upon research, showing uses or probable uses of beef and beef products;

Study state and federal legislation with respect to tariffs, duties, reciprocal trade agreements, import quotas and other matters concerning the beef industry;

Sue and be sued as a council, without individual liability, for acts of the council within the scope of the powers and duties conferred upon it by this act;

Enter into contracts to carry out the purpose of the council as provided in this act, including contracts for promotion of beef and beef products and development of new markets through such promotion;

Appoint advisory groups composed of representatives from organizations, institutions or business related to or interested in the welfare of the beef industry;

Make grants to research agencies for financing special or emergency studies, or for purchase or acquisition of facilities necessary to carry out the purposes of the council;

Employ and remove for cause employees to assist in the discharge of the duties authorized by this act;

Cooperate with any local, state or nationwide organization or agency engaged in work or activities similar to or related to those of the council, and enter into contracts with such organizations or agencies for carrying on joint programs;

Act jointly and in cooperation with the state or federal government, or both, or any agency thereof in the administration of any program of the government or of a governmental agency deemed by the council as beneficial to the beef industry of this state and expend funds in connection therewith;

Adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this act;

Adopt, rescind, modify or amend all proper regulations, orders and resolutions for the exercise of its powers and duties.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 224, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 11-691; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-42-104; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1989, ch. 112, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-37-102(a)(vii).

§ 11-37-105.
Authority to accept grants.

The council may accept
grants, donations, contributions or gifts from any source for expenditures
for any purpose consistent with the powers and duties conferred on
the council.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 224, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 11-692; W.S. 1977, § 11-42-105; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-37-106.
Contributions allowed.

From the funds it receives,
the council may pay or contribute to organizations such as, but not
limited to, the national livestock and meat board, to carry out work
and programs approved by the council.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 224, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 11-693; W.S. 1977, § 11-42-106; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-37-107.
Creation
of account; collection of additional brand inspection fee; disposition
of proceeds.

All monies received by the council shall be deposited in the state treasury. The state treasurer shall deposit the monies to the credit of the beef council account. Interest earned on monies in the account shall be deposited to the credit of the account. All monies in the account including earned interest shall be expended only for the purposes authorized by this act.

In addition to the brand inspection fee provided in W.S.

11-20-401

the board shall collect an additional amount not to exceed one dollar ($1.00) per head on cattle and calves under the same authority and at the same time, place and manner as brand inspections are made excluding cattle and calves being inspected when no change in ownership is involved. Fees collected by the board shall be deposited with the state treasurer to the credit of the account created by subsection (a) of this section. Monies received by the council under this subsection shall be used to administer this act.

The council shall at the end of each month reimburse the livestock board for collection and administrative costs incurred by the board in collecting the fee under subsection (b) of this section. The amount reimbursed shall equal three percent (3%) of the fees collected during the month and shall be deposited with the state treasurer to the credit of the board’s inspection account created by subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 224, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 11-694; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 11-42-107; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 13, § 1; 1989, ch. 112, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the trust and agency fund” at the end of the second sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-37-102(a)(vii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 11-37-108.
Failure to pay or remit monies due or collected; penalty.

Any person who fails
to pay or remit any monies, due or collected, as provided in this
act, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction may be fined not
to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 224, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 11-695; W.S. 1977, § 11-42-108; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1989, ch. 112, § 1.

§ 11-37-109.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989,
ch. 112, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 224, § 9, related to the right to a refund of contributions.

§ 11-37-110.
Surety bond required to receive or disburse funds.

Any person authorized
by the council to receive or disburse funds, as provided by this act,
shall post with the council a surety bond in an amount the council
determines sufficient, for which the cost or premium shall be paid
by the council.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 224, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 11-697; W.S. 1977, § 11-42-110; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-37-102(a)(vii).